Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-460
Methamphetamine precursor; access
to exchange to law enforcement.

As a condition of use in Nebraska, the National Association
of Drug Diversion Investigators shall provide real-time access to the exchange
through its online portal to law enforcement in this state as authorized by
the Attorney General and no fee or charge shall be imposed on a seller for
the use of the exchange.

Laws 2011, LB20, § 5.